Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 2. Public Records
§ 16-4-205.
Penalties; remedies.

Any person who knowingly or intentionally violates the provisions of this act is liable for a penalty not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00). The penalty may be recovered in a civil action and damages may be assessed by the court.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 145, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.5; W.S. 1977, § 9-9-105; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1995, ch. 110, § 1; 2012, ch. 74, § 1; 2019 ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted the first sentence for the former section which read: “Any person who willfully and knowingly violates the provisions of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)” and added the second and third sentences.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “may” for “shall” and deleted the last sentence, which read: “Any action pursuant to this section shall be initiated by the attorney general or the appropriate county attorney.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-4-201(a)(viii).

Cited in

Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. Bd. of Trs. of Sheridan Cnty. Sch. Dist. #2, 2015 WY 70,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(May 14, 2015).

Quoted in

Williams v. Matheny, 2017 WY 85, 398 P.3d 521,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of state freedom of information act provisions concerning award of attorney's fees and other litigation costs,118 ALR 5th 1.